District of Columbia statutes.
31-4719

Authority to hold proceeds under trust or agreement.

Any life company licensed under the laws of the District shall have power to hold the proceeds of any policy issued by it under a trust or other agreement upon such terms and restrictions as to revocation by the policyholder and control by beneficiaries and with such exemptions from the claims of creditors or beneficiaries other than the policyholder as shall have been agreed to in writing by such company and the policyholder. Such insurance company shall not be required to segregate funds so held, but may hold them as a part of its general corporate assets.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1176, ch. 672, ch. V, § 19
1981 Ed., § 35-525.
1973 Ed., § 35-720.